Utah statutes.
53A-1-402.5.    State board rules establishing basic ethical conduct standards -- Local school board policies.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules that establish basic ethical conduct standards for public education employees who provide education-related services outside of their regular employment to their current or prospective public school students.

(2)  The rules shall provide that a local school board may adopt policies implementing the standards and addressing circumstances present in the district.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

